apertium-pus.pus.dix
    <pardef n="/مونږ__prn">
      <e><p><l>مونږ</l><r>مونږ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>موږ</l><r>مونږ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>مونږ</l><r>مونږ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>موږ</l><r>مونږ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/تاسی__prn">
      <e><p><l>تاسی</l><r>تاسی<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>تاسو</l><r>تاسی<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تاسی</l><r>تاسی<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>تاسو</l><r>تاسی<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="مونږ"><i></i><par n="/مونږ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="تاسی"><i></i><par n="/تاسی__prn"/></e>
